District of Columbia statutes.
38-1205.09

Review of records.

The District of Columbia Auditor shall, upon request, be provided access to all books, accounts, records, reports, findings and all other papers, things, or property belonging to, or in use by, the School of Law, in accordance with the provisions of § 1-204.55.

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title V, § 509
as added Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 2(a), 33 DCR 7241
1981 Ed., § 31-1549.